New Jersey, session 222, S1536.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Any action concerning a home improvement contract: a.     brought by a contractor against an owner, tenant, or lessee of a residential or non-commercial property, or b.    brought by an owner, tenant, or lessee of a residential or non-commercial property against a contractor, may be commenced in the Superior Court of the county in which the property is located. As used in this act, the terms contractor, home improvement contract, and residential or non-commercial property shall have the meanings ascribed to them in section 2 of P.L.2004, c.16 (C.56:8-137). 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to any action commenced on or after the effective date.